csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_IND_aw.yaml
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+Incl: gimikaagominaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: gimikaagonaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: gimikaagonaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+Incl: gimikaagoominaaban
